Utah statutes.
53A-12-206.   Repurchase and resale of textbooks.

(1)  If a student moves from a district in which free textbooks were not provided, the school board of that district may purchase the books used by the student at a reasonable price, based upon the original cost and the condition of the book upon return.

(2)  The books purchased by the district under this section may be resold to other students in the district.

